test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pyi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - пя: # Noun 'tree' - partial paradigm /Type 3/
     пя+N+Sg+Nom: пя
     пя+N+Sg+Acc: пямʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen: пяʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat: пянʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc: пяхана
     пя+N+Sg+Abl: пяхад
     пя+N+Sg+Pros: пявна
     пя+N+Du+Nom: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom: пяˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc: пи
     пя+N+Pl+Gen: пиˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat: пяхаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc: пяхаˮна
     пя+N+Pl+Abl: пяхат
     пя+N+Pl+Pros: пяˮамна  #TNI:123
     
     пя+N+Tra: пяӈэ     
     пя+N+Car: пясиˮ
     пя+N+Equ: пядремʼ
     пя+N+Equ+Lat: пядревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: пяв 
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пяр  
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пяда 
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: пямиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: пяриʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: пядиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: пяваˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: пяраˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: пядоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [пяв, пями]  
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: пямд  
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: пямда 
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: пямиʼ 
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: пямдиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: пямдиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: пяваˮ 
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: пямдаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: пямдоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [пян, пяни]  
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: пянд  
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: пянда 
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: пяниʼ 
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: пяндиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: пяндиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: пянаˮ 
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: пяндаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: пяндоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [пяхан, пяхани]  
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: пяханд  
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: пяханда 
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: пяханиʼ 
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: пяхандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: пяхандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: пяханаˮ 
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: пяхандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: пяхандоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [пяханан, пяханани] 
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: пяхананд  
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: пяхананда 
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: пяхананиʼ 
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: пяханандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: пяханандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: пяхананаˮ 
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: пяханандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: пяханандоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [пяхадан, пяхадани] 
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: пяхаданд  
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: пяхаданда 
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: пяхаданиʼ 
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: пяхадандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: пяхадандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: пяхаданаˮ 
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: пяхадандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: пяхадандоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [пявнан, пявнани]
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: пявнанд  
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: пявнанда 
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: пявнаниʼ 
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: пявнандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: пявнандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: пявнанаˮ 
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: пявнандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: пявнандоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: пяхаюн  
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: пяхаюд  
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: пяхаюда 
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: пяхаюниʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: пяхаюдаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: пяхаюдоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: пяхаюн  
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: пяхаюд  
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: пяхаюда 
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: пяхаюниʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: пяхаюдаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: пяхаюдоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: пяхаюн  
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: пяхают  
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: пяхаюта 
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: пяхаюниʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: пяхаютиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: пяхаютиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: пяхаютаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: пяхаютоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [пин, пини]   
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: пид   
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: пида  
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: пиниʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: пидиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: пидиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: пинаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: пидаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: пидоʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [пин, пини]   
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: пид   
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: пида  
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: пиниʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: пидиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: пидиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: пинаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: пидаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: пидоʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: пиˮин  
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: пит   
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: пита  
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: пиˮниʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: питиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: питиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: пиˮнаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: питаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: питоʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: пяхаˮн 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: пяхат 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: пяхата 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: пяхаˮниʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: пяхатиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: пяхатиʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: пяхаˮнаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: пяхатаˮ 
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: пяхатоʼ 
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: пяхаˮнан  
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: пяхаˮнат  
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: пяхаˮната 
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: пяхаˮнаниʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: пяхаˮнатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: пяхаˮнатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: пяхаˮнанаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: пяхаˮнатаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: пяхаˮнатоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: пяхатан 
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: пяхатат 
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: пяхатата 
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: пяхатаниʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: пяхататиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: пяхататиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: пяхатанаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: пяхататаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: пяхататоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: пяˮамнан  
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: пяˮамнат  
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: пяˮамната 
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: пяˮамнаниʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: пяˮамнатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: пяˮамнатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: пяˮамнанаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: пяˮамнатаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: пяˮамнатоʼ

# Predestinative

     пя+N+Pred+Abs: пяд
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: пядав 
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: пядар  
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [пядада, пядда] 
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: пядав
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: пядамд
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: пядамда
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: пядан
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: пяданд
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: пяданда
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [пядамиʼ, пядмиʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [пядариʼ, пядриʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [пядадиʼ, пяддиʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [пядамиʼ, пядмиʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: пядамдиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: пядамдиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [пяданиʼ, пядниʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: пядандиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: пядандиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [пядаваˮ, пядваˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [пядараˮ, пядраˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [пядадоʼ, пяддоʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [пядаваˮ, пядваˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: пядамдаˮ
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: пядамдоʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [пяданаˮ, пяднаˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: пядандаˮ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: пядандоʼ

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: пядмʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: пян  
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пя   
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: пяниʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: пядиʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: пяваˮ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: пядаˮ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пяˮ  
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: пядамзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: пянась 
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пясь   
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: пянинзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: пядинзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяханзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: пяваць 
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: пядаць 
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пяць   
